Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB349.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5102 of Title 71 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 5102. Definitions.The following words and phrases as used in this part, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:* * *" Municipal police officer. " An individual employed as a police officer who is certified under the act of February 1, 1974 (P.L.34, No.15), known as the Pennsylvania Municipal Retirement Law.* * *1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 2. Section 5304(c)(7) and (8) of Title 71 are amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 5304. Creditable nonstate service.* * *(c) Limitations on nonstate service.--Creditable nonstate service credit shall be limited to:* * *(7) service prior to July 1, 1971, at a community college established under the act of August 24, 1963 (P.L.1132, No.484), known as the Community College Act of 1963; [or](8) service as a justice of the peace prior to January 1970[.]; or(9) service as a municipal police officer within this Commonwealth by a member of the Pennsylvania State Police, the credit for such service not to exceed five years.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0349PN0304 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819